Connecticut, session 2026, HB05136.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to provide that
the additional one per cent sales and use taxes imposed on meals sold
by an eating establishment, caterer or grocery store be dedicated to (1)
distribution to municipalities in which the revenue was generated, and
(2) deposit in the Tourism Fund, established under section 10-395b of
the general statutes.